New York, session 2025-2026, A8306.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 5 of paragraph (a) of section 5-3.1 of the 2 estates, powers and trusts law, as amended by chapter 437 of the laws of 3 2010, is amended to read as follows: 4 (5) One motor vehicle not exceeding in value [twenty-five] fifty thou- 5 sand dollars. In the alternative, if the decedent shall have been the 6 owner of one or more motor vehicles each of which exceed [twenty-five] 7 fifty thousand dollars in value, the surviving spouse or decedent's 8 children may acquire one such motor vehicle from the estate, regardless 9 of the fact that the decedent may also have been the owner of another 10 motor vehicle of lesser value than [twenty-five] fifty thousand dollars, 11 by payment to the estate of the amount by which the value of the motor 12 vehicle exceeds [twenty-five] fifty thousand dollars; in lieu of receiv- 13 ing such motor vehicle, the surviving spouse or children may elect to 14 receive in cash an amount equal to the value of the motor vehicle, not 15 to exceed [twenty-five] fifty thousand dollars. If any motor vehicle so 16 acquired by the spouse or children of the decedent was a specific legacy 17 in decedent's will, the payment to the estate of the amount by which the 18 value of the motor vehicle exceeds [twenty-five] fifty thousand dollars 19 shall vest in the specific legatee. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 21 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09978-01-5